Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.270

Unanticipated receipts—Duty of department heads.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other sources, which was not anticipated in the budget approved by the legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of any department, agency, board, or commission through which such expenditure shall be made is to submit to the governor a statement which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the need for such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED, That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount received, and no money shall be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law which is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to the joint legislative audit and review committee and also to the standing committees on ways and means of the house and senate if the legislature is in session at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money from any source that was not anticipated in the transportation budget approved by the legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of a department, agency, board, or commission through which the expenditure must be made shall submit to the governor a statement, which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment, setting forth the facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess of the actual amount received, and no money may be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of appropriations provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated revenues must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on transportation of the house and senate at the same time as it is transmitted to the governor.

(3) During the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, whenever any money in the amount of $5,000,000 or more, from the federal government, or from other sources, which was not anticipated in the operating, capital, or transportation budget approved by the legislature has been awarded or has actually been received when the legislature is not in session and the use of the money is unrestricted or provides discretion to use the moneys for more than one agency, program, or purpose, the governor must:

(a) Submit a copy of the proposed allotment amendment to the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee;

(b) Provide an explanation of the timing, source, and availability of such funds and why the need for the expenditure could not have been anticipated in time for such expenditure to have been approved as part of a budget act for that particular fiscal year; and

(c) Provide the joint legislative unanticipated revenue oversight committee 14 calendar days from submittal the opportunity to review and comment on the proposed allotment amendment before approving under RCW 43.79.280.

[ 2021 c 334 s 972; 2005 c 319 s 105; 1998 c 177 s 1; 1996 c 288 s 37; 1973 c 144 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.270. Prior: 1945 c 243 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5517-13.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Findings—Intent—Part headings—Effective dates—2005 c 319: See notes following RCW 43.17.020.